Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2078.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 27-1271, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE27-1271. Submission and contents of reclamation plan A. Beginning January 1, 2006, An owner or operator may submit a single reclamation plan that covers multiple aggregate mining units of an aggregate mining facility. B. The proposed reclamation plan shall include: 1. The names and addresses of the owner or operator and an individual who will be the regulatory contact. 2. A statement that the owner or operator assumes responsibility for the reclamation of surface disturbances that are attributable to the aggregate mining unit consistent with this chapter and the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter. 3. The current ownership and use of the land included in the aggregate mining unit. 4. The proposed postaggregate mining use of the land. 5. A description of the aggregate mining unit and the proposed surface disturbances that will be created. 6. The existing and proposed final topography, including the final slopes or configuration of overburden or waste rock stockpiles and fine areas. 7. A narrative description of roads that are proposed for the aggregate mining unit. 8. The acreage affected by each type of surface disturbance and a map of the aggregate mining unit area showing each surface disturbance.  For previously undisturbed areas, the map shall identify any types of fish and wildlife habitats that will be disturbed. 9. The proposed reclamation measures that are necessary to achieve the postaggregate mining land use, including information concerning: (a) The measures that will be taken to restrict public access to pits and other surface features that may be a hazard to public safety. (b) The measures that will be taken to address erosion control and stability. (c) The measures that will be taken to address revegetation, conservation and the care and monitoring of revegetated areas as provided in this chapter. (d) For surface disturbances for which the proposed postaggregate mining land use objective is designated as grazing, fish or wildlife habitat, forestry or recreation, the type of wildlife or fish habitat to be encouraged, including measures that will be taken to encourage that type of wildlife or fish habitat, and that those measures will not be incompatible with the fish or wildlife habitat on adjacent lands. 10. A proposed tentative schedule for beginning surface disturbances and beginning and completing the reclamation measures. 11. The estimated costs to perform each of the proposed reclamation measures for the purposes of determining financial assurance requirements under article 5 of this chapter. 12. The distance in feet and the direction from the closest existing occupied residential structures and aggregate mining facility. For the purposes of this paragraph, the distance shall be measured from the exterior of the occupied residential structure to the closest crest of excavation and includes any intermediate rights-of-way between the structure and proposed facility. 13. A statement that the owner or operator has provided a notice of the proposed reclamation plan aggregate mining unit to each residential property owner owners whose property is properties are located within a one-half mile radius of the aggregate mining operation as shown on the current property tax roll. The notice shall include the name and contact information of the owner owner's or operator's designated representative who will respond to questions regarding the proposed reclamation plan aggregate mining unit. the notice requirement prescribed by this paragraph: (a) Applies only to new proposed reclamation plans for new aggregate mining operations that are submitted to the inspector from and after September 15, 2024. (b) May be satisfied by providing prior public notices relating to special use permitting or rezoning or annexation applications or by providing other public notices associated with the proposed aggregate mining unit if the public notices were published or distributed or displayed within at least a one-half mile radius of the aggregate mining operation. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Retroactivity This act applies retroactively to from and after September 15, 2024. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 4, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 5, 2026.